Nebraska, session 109, LB1153.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1153 LB1153
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 59-1608.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
59-1608.03 When the Attorney General, on behalf of a state agency or
political subdivision, is authorized to investigate, file suit, or
otherwise take action in connection with violations under the Consumer
Protection Act, any recovery of damages or costs by judgment, court
decree, settlement in or out of court, or other final result shall be
subject to the following:
(1) Upon recovery of damages or any monetary payment, except
criminal penalties, the costs, expenses, or billings incurred by any
state agency or political subdivision in any investigation or other
action arising out of a violation under the act shall be sought out in
any judgment, court decree, settlement in or out of court, or other final
result. Any recovered costs shall be deposited by the Attorney General in
the fund from which such costs were expended;
(2) When the Attorney General makes recovery pursuant to the act on
behalf of a state agency or political subdivision of any money, funds,
securities, or other things of value in the nature of civil damages or
other payment, except criminal penalties, whether such recovery is by way
of verdict, judgment, compromise, or settlement in or out of court, or
other final disposition of any case or controversy, such money, funds,
securities, or other things of value shall be deposited by the Attorney
General in the fund from which the funds which are being recovered were
expended;
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2026, and except (3) Except as otherwise
provided by law, the State Settlement Cash Fund shall consist of all
recoveries received pursuant to the act, including any money, funds,
securities, or other things of value in the nature of civil damages or
other payment, except criminal penalties, whether such recovery is by way
of verdict, judgment, compromise, or settlement in or out of court, or
other final disposition of any case or controversy, or any other payments
-2-

LB1153 LB1153
2026 2026
received on behalf of the state by the Department of Justice and
administered by the Attorney General for the benefit of the state or the
general welfare of its citizens, but excluding all funds held in a trust
capacity where specific benefits accrue to specific individuals,
organizations, or governments. ; and
(b)(i) Beginning July 1, 2026, and except as otherwise provided by
law and subject to subdivision (b)(ii) of this subsection, all recoveries
received pursuant to the act, including any money, funds, securities, or
other things of value in the nature of civil damages or other payment,
except criminal penalties, whether such recovery is by way of verdict,
judgment, compromise, or settlement in or out of court, or other final
disposition of any case or controversy, or any other payments received on
behalf of the state by the Department of Justice and administered by the
Attorney General for the benefit of the state or the general welfare of
its citizens, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be distributed
as follows:
(A) One percent to the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural
Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund;
(B) One percent to the Financial Literacy Cash Fund;
(C) One percent to the Board of Regents of the University of
Nebraska for the tenant assistance project;
(D) One percent to the University of Nebraska Medical Center for
pediatric cancer research; and
(E) Ninety-six percent for the use and support of common schools in
the same manner as all fines, penalties, and license money are
distributed under Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of
Nebraska.
(ii) Subdivision (b)(i) of this subsection shall not apply to any
funds held in a trust capacity where specific benefits accrue to specific
individuals, organizations, or governments; and
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, the State Settlement Trust
-3-

LB1153 LB1153
2026 2026
Fund shall consist of all recoveries received pursuant to the act,
including any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in the
nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal penalties,
whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or
settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or
controversy, or any other payments received on behalf of the state by the
Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General, but to
include only those funds held in a trust capacity where specific benefits
accrue to specific individuals, organizations, or governments.
Sec. 2. Section 59-1608.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
59-1608.04 (1) The State Settlement Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be maintained by the Department of Justice and administered by the
Attorney General. Except as otherwise provided by law, the fund shall
consist of all recoveries received pursuant to the Consumer Protection
Act, including any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in
the nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal penalties,
whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or
settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or
controversy, or any other payments received on behalf of the state by the
Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General for the
benefit of the state or the general welfare of its citizens, but
excluding all funds held in a trust capacity where specific benefits
accrue to specific individuals, organizations, or governments. The fund
may be expended for any allowable legal purposes as determined by the
Attorney General. Transfers from the State Settlement Cash Fund may be
made at the direction of the Legislature to the Nebraska Capital
Construction Fund, the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural
Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund, the Nebraska State Patrol Cash
Fund, the Financial Literacy Cash Fund, and the General Fund. To provide
necessary financial accountability and management oversight, revenue from
-4-

LB1153 LB1153
2026 2026
individual settlement agreements or other separate sources credited to
the State Settlement Cash Fund may be tracked and accounted for within
the state accounting system through the use of separate and distinct
funds, subfunds, or any other available accounting mechanism specifically
approved by the Accounting Administrator for use by the Department of
Justice. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning
October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the
fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) The State Settlement Cash Fund terminates on July 1, 2026. The
State Treasurer shall distribute any money remaining in the fund on such
date as provided in subdivision (3)(b)(i) of section 59-1608.03.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million five hundred
thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Nebraska
Capital Construction Fund on July 1, 2013, or as soon thereafter as
administratively possible.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer eight hundred seventy-six
thousand nine hundred ninety-eight dollars from the State Settlement Cash
Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2018, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million seven hundred
fifty-six thousand six hundred thirty-nine dollars from the State
Settlement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2019, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal
Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance
Fund on or before April 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as
-5-

LB1153 LB1153
2026 2026
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal Education for
Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund on or
before July 9, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 3. Section 59-1608.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
59-1608.05 (1)(a) The State Settlement Trust Fund is created. The
fund shall be maintained by the Department of Justice and administered by
the Attorney General. Except as otherwise provided by law and subject to
subdivision (1)(b) of this section, the fund shall consist of:
(i) All all recoveries received pursuant to the Consumer Protection
Act, including any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in
the nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal penalties,
whether such recovery shall be by way of verdict, judgment, compromise,
or settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case
or controversy; and , or
(ii) Any any other payments received on behalf of the state by the
Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General. ,
(b) The State Settlement Trust Fund shall but to include only those
funds held in a trust capacity where specific benefits accrue to specific
individuals, organizations, or governments.
(2) All money in the State Settlement Trust Fund shall be subject to
legislative review, but shall not be subject to legislative
appropriation. The fund shall be expended consistent with any legal
restrictions placed on the funds. The fund shall be paid from the same
budget program used to record revenue and expenditures of the State
Settlement Cash Fund, except that the fund shall only be expended from a
-6-

LB1153 LB1153
2026 2026
separate and distinct budget subprogram and shall not be commingled with
any other revenue or expenditure.
(3) To provide necessary financial accountability and management
oversight, revenue from individual settlement agreements or other
separate sources credited to the fund may be tracked and accounted for
within the state accounting system through the use of separate and
distinct funds, subfunds, or any other available accounting mechanism
specifically approved by the Accounting Administrator for use by the
Department of Justice.
(4) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 4. Original sections 59-1608.03 and 59-1608.05, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 59-1608.04, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-7-